Missouri, session 2026, SB1178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.1067, to read as
follows:
191.1067. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "340B covered hospital", an entity described in 42
U.S.C. Section 256b(a)(4)(L) to 42 U.S.C. Section
256b(a)(4)(O) that:
(a) Is authorized to participate in the federal 340B
Drug Pricing Program under Section 340B of the federal
Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 256b(a)(4), and
has a service address in this state as of January first of
the reporting year; or
(b) Any offsite outpatient facility affiliated under
the 340B program with an entity described in this
subdivision;
(2) "340B program" or "340B drug pricing program", the
federal 340B Drug Pricing Program established under 42
U.S.C. Section 256b;

SB 1178 2
(3) "Charity care", the unreimbursed cost to a
hospital of providing, funding, or otherwise financially
supporting health care services:
(a) To a person classified by the hospital as
financially indigent or medically indigent on an inpatient
or outpatient basis; or
(b) To financially indigent patients through other
nonprofit or public outpatient clinics, hospitals, or health
care organizations;
(4) "Financially indigent", an uninsured or
underinsured person who is accepted for care with no
obligation or a discounted obligation to pay for the
services rendered based on the hospital's financial criteria
and procedures used to determine if a patient is eligible
for charity care, provided that the criteria and procedures
include income levels and means testing indexed to the
federal poverty guidelines. A hospital may determine that a
person is financially or medically indigent under the
hospital's eligibility system after health care services are
provided;
(5) "Medically indigent", a person whose medical or
hospital bills after payment by third-party payers exceed a
specified percentage of the patient's annual gross income as
determined in accordance with the hospital's eligibility
system, and who is financially unable to pay the remaining
bill.
2. Before April first of each year, a 340B covered
hospital shall report to the department of health and senior
services the following information and transactions
concerning the 340B covered hospital's participation in, or
participation on behalf of the 340B covered hospital in, the
federal 340B program for the previous calendar year:

SB 1178 3
(1) The 340B covered hospital's:
(a) Name;
(b) Service address;
(c) 340B program identification number; and
(d) Designation of entity type as specified in 42
U.S.C. Section 256b(a)(4);
(2) The aggregate acquisition cost for all
prescription drugs obtained under the 340B program and
dispensed or administered to patients;
(3) The aggregate payment amount received for all
drugs obtained under the 340B program and dispensed or
administered to patients;
(4) The aggregate payment made to pharmacies under
contract to dispense drugs obtained under the 340B program;
(5) The number of claims for prescription drugs
described in subdivision (3) of this subsection;
(6) How the 340B covered hospital uses any savings
from participating in the 340B program, including the amount
of savings used for the provision of charity care, community
benefits, or a similar program of providing unreimbursed or
subsidized health care;
(7) The aggregate payments made to any other entity
that is not a 340B covered hospital and is not a contract
pharmacy, as described in subdivision (4) of this
subsection, for managing any aspect of the 340B covered
hospital's utilization of the 340B program;
(8) The aggregate payment made for any other
administering expense for the 340B program;
(9) The aggregate number of prescription drugs
dispensed or administered to patients for which a payment
was reported under subdivision (3) of this subsection;

SB 1178 4
(10) The percentage of the 340B covered hospital's
claims that were for prescription drugs obtained under the
340B program;
(11) The number and percentage of low income patients
of the 340B covered hospital that were served by a sliding
fee scale for a prescription drug dispensed or administered
under the 340B program;
(12) The 340B covered hospital's total operating costs;
(13) The 340B covered hospital's total costs for
charity care; and
(14) A copy of the 340B covered hospital's financial
assistance policy for the reporting year.
3. The information required to be reported under
subdivisions (3) to (5) of subsection 2 of this section
shall, to the extent feasible, be reported by payer type,
including the following:
(1) Commercial;
(2) Medicaid or MO HealthNet;
(3) Medicare; and
(4) Uninsured.
100 4. The data submitted in the reports required under
101 subsection 2 of this section shall be closed records under
102 chapter 610.
103 5. Before November fifteenth of each year, the
104 department of health and senior services shall prepare a
105 report that aggregates the data submitted under subsections
106 2 and 3 of this section, shall provide the report to the
107 general assembly in electronic format, and shall publish the
108 report on the department's publicly accessible website.
109 6. A 340B covered hospital that fails to provide the
110 information required under subsection 2 or 3 of this section
111 by the date required in this section shall be subject to a

SB 1178 5
112 civil penalty of one thousand dollars per day the
113 information is past due.
✓